Indiana, session 2026, HB1172.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-11-2-33, AS ADDED BY P.L.161-2014,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 33. (a) As used in this section, "law
enforcement agency" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-47-15-2.
(b) The superintendent shall adopt guidelines to accomplish the
following:
(1) Establish a standard medical forensic examination kit for
victims of a sex crime.
(2) Create and distribute a reporting form in print or
electronic format, or both, for law enforcement agencies to
provide the superintendent with the following information
concerning medical forensic examination kits:
(A) The total number of kits collected by the law
enforcement agency.
(B) The total number of kits:
(i) in the law enforcement agency's possession; and
(ii) awaiting testing by a crime lab.
2026 IN 1172—LS 6225/DI 151


(C) The average number of days between a law
enforcement agency's submission of a kit to a crime lab for
testing and the production of the kit's test results.
(c) The information described in subsection (b)(2) shall be
provided to the superintendent:
(1) in the manner prescribed by the guidelines adopted under
this section; and
(2) not later than July 1 of each year.
(b) (d) The superintendent shall distribute the standard medical
forensic examination kits to hospitals and other health care providers
who may provide forensic medical examinations to the victims of a sex
crime. The superintendent may adopt guidelines to carry out this
subsection.
(e) The superintendent shall provide a summary of the
information described in subsection (b)(2) in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6 to the legislative council before September 1 of
each year for the preceding state fiscal year.
2026 IN 1172—LS 6225/DI 151